Illinois, session 104th, HB483.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Agreement Among the States to Elect the 5President by National Popular Vote Act is amended by changing 6Section 1 as follows: 7    (10 ILCS 20/1)8    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 9Agreement Among the States to Elect the President by National 10Popular Vote Act.11(Source: P.A. 95-714, eff. 1-1-09.)